Indiana, session 2026, HB1315.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-1.5-4-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.202-2013,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 13. (a) The legislative body of a political
subdivision that receives a certified resolution under section 10 or 12
of this chapter may shall do any of the following:
(1) Adopt a resolution declining to participate in a proposed
reorganization. The resolution must detail why the political
subdivision does not wish to participate in the reorganization.
(2) Adopt a substantially identical resolution proposing to
participate in a proposed reorganization with the political
subdivisions named in a resolution certified to the political
subdivision.
(3) Adopt a resolution proposing to participate in a proposed
reorganization with political subdivisions that differ in part or in
whole from the political subdivisions named in a resolution
certified to the political subdivision.
(b) The clerk of the political subdivision adopting a resolution
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


proposing a reorganization under this section shall certify the
resolution to the clerk of each political subdivision named in the
resolution.
SECTION 2. IC 36-1.5-4.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 4.1. Reorganization of Certain Townships
Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a township:
(1) located in a county having a consolidated city; or
(2) that, not later than December 31, 2026, has begun to
consolidate with another:
(A) township under IC 36-6-1.5; or
(B) unit under IC 36-1.5-4; or
(3) located in a county in which each township located in the
county consolidates in accordance with subdivision (2) to
establish not more than one (1) township whose boundaries
coincide with the boundaries of the county and the
consolidated township would not meet the population
requirement described in section 6(1)(A) of this chapter.
Sec. 2. To the extent that other provisions in this article conflict
with this chapter, this chapter controls.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "designated unit" means:
(1) a county or municipality that is named by a township in a
resolution under section 13 of this chapter; or
(2) a county that becomes the designated unit under section 14
of this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "plan" or "plan of
reorganization" means a plan of reorganization approved by the
legislative body of a designated unit under this chapter.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "reorganization" means the
dissolution of a township and the transfer of township property,
functions, powers, and services to the designated unit.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "township" means either of the
following:
(1) A township that satisfies all of the following criteria:
(A) The township has a population of less than six
thousand seven hundred (6,700) as determined by the most
recent federal decennial census.
(B) The township does not operate a fire department. For
purposes of this clause, a township that is:
(i) a participating unit that is not a provider unit in a fire
protection territory; or
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


(ii) part of a fire protection district;
does not operate a fire department.
(C) In calendar year 2024, the total value of benefits
provided to recipients of township assistance (as reported
in the township's annual statistical report under
IC 12-20-28-3) does not exceed two hundred percent
(200%) of the sum of all compensation paid to township
employees (as reported in the township's annual report
filed under IC 5-11-13-1).
(2) A township that satisfies all of the following criteria:
(A) At least eighty percent (80%) of the total area of the
township is located within the corporate boundaries of a
municipality.
(B) At least fifty-one percent (51%) of the township's
population resides within the corporate boundaries of a
municipality described in clause (A).
(C) The township does not operate a fire department. For
purposes of this clause, a township that is:
(i) a participating unit that is not a provider unit in a fire
protection territory; or
(ii) part of a fire protection district;
does not operate a fire department.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "township office" refers to any
of the following:
(1) The office of township trustee elected as provided in
IC 36-6-4-2.
(2) The office of township assessor elected as provided in
IC 36-6-5-1 (if the office exists).
(3) The office of a member of the township board elected as
provided in IC 36-6-6-2.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "township services" means the
following:
(1) Township assistance under IC 12-20 and IC 12-30-4.
(2) Provision of insulin to the poor under IC 12-20-16.
(3) Fire protection services under IC 36-8.
(4) Fence viewing under IC 32-26.
(5) Provision and maintenance of cemeteries under IC 23-14.
(6) Provision and maintenance of township parks and
community centers under IC 36-10.
(7) Destruction of detrimental plants, noxious weeds, and rank
vegetation under IC 15-16-8.
(8) Any other services required by statute to be provided by
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


a township.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "township services district"
means a service district that is located within the boundaries of the
reorganized township in which the designated unit imposes a
township services district levy.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "township services district levy"
means the budget, tax rate, and tax levy imposed by the designated
unit within the boundaries of a township services district.
Sec. 11. (a) On January 1, 2028, each township is dissolved. All
of the following occur:
(1) The term of office of an individual who holds a township
office ends on December 31, 2027. An election for a township
office shall not be held in 2028 or thereafter.
(2) The:
(A) powers and duties of the office of township trustee are
transferred to the executive of the designated unit;
(B) legislative powers and duties of the office of township
board members are transferred to the legislative body of
the designated unit;
(C) fiscal powers and duties of the office of township board
members are transferred to the fiscal body of the
designated unit; and
(D) powers and duties of the township assessor (if the office
exists) are transferred to the county assessor.
(3) The boundaries of the dissolved township remain as the
boundaries of the service area within which the designated
unit provides township services.
(4) If a township participates in a fire protection territory or
fire protection district, the fire protection territory or fire
protection district is unaffected by the reorganization and the
area within the boundaries of the dissolved township remain
a part of the fire protection territory or fire protection district
after reorganization. The designated unit succeeds the
township in the township's role as:
(A) participating unit that is not a provider unit in the fire
protection territory; or
(B) participant in the fire protection district;
for the area within the boundaries of the dissolved township.
(5) The balance in the general fund of the township shall be
transferred to the general fund of the designated unit.
(6) The balance in the township assistance fund of a township
shall be transferred to a township assistance fund established
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


by the designated unit.
(7) The balance of any other fund of the township shall be
transferred to the fund of the designated unit that most
closely corresponds to the fund of the township.
(8) Subject to section 30 of this chapter, the property and
liabilities of the township become the property and liabilities
of the designated unit.
(b) IC 36-1-8-5 does not apply to a balance referred to in
subsection (a).
Sec. 12. (a) A township that is described in:
(1) section 6(1) of this chapter and that is adjacent to a
municipality; or
(2) section 6(2) of this chapter;
may designate the municipality in a resolution under section 13 of
this chapter. A township is not adjacent to a municipality if the
township and municipality are connected by a strip of land that is
less than one hundred fifty (150) feet wide.
(b) A township that is described in section 6(1) or 6(2) of this
chapter may designate a county in a resolution under section 13 of
this chapter.
Sec. 13. (a) The legislative body of a township shall adopt a
resolution not later than June 1, 2026, that:
(1) proposes a reorganization; and
(2) designates:
(A) one (1) municipality; or
(B) one (1) county;
that satisfies the criteria under section 12 of this chapter for
reorganizing with the township.
(b) The township trustee of the township shall certify the
resolution to:
(1) the county clerk; and
(2) if the designated unit is a municipality, the clerk of the
municipality.
If the designated unit meets the criteria under section 12 of this
chapter, the designated unit and the township shall appoint a joint
board under section 16 of this chapter.
Sec. 14. If a township fails to adopt a resolution under section 13
of this chapter not later than June 1, 2026, the county in which the
township is primarily located shall be the designated unit of the
township without the township adopting a resolution or taking
further action. A joint board shall be appointed under section 16
of this chapter, and the county shall reorganize with the township
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


as provided in this chapter.
Sec. 15. If a designated unit is named by two (2) or more
townships in resolutions under section 13 of this chapter, the
designated unit may:
(1) appoint a single joint board under section 16 of this
chapter; and
(2) prepare and adopt a single reorganization plan;
to govern the reorganization of the townships, instead of
appointing separate boards and adopting separate plans for each
of the townships.
Sec. 16. (a) A joint board shall consist of the following:
(1) Two (2) members of the township board of each township
participating in the reorganization, selected by the members
of the township board.
(2) Four (4) members of the legislative body of the designated
municipality or of the fiscal body of the designated county,
whichever is applicable, selected by the members of the body.
(3) The township trustee of each township participating in the
reorganization.
(4) The deputy township trustee or a full-time township
employee of each township participating in the
reorganization.
The fiscal officer of the designated municipality or county, and
other members of the bodies under subdivisions (1) and (2), shall
serve as advisory, nonvoting members.
(b) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum.
Official action may only be taken by affirmative vote of at least a
majority of members present at the meeting.
(c) The members of a joint board serve without compensation.
The members are entitled to reimbursement from the reorganizing
township and designated units for the necessary expenses incurred
in the performance of their duties.
(d) A joint board is subject to IC 5-14-1.5 and IC 5-14-3.
(e) The joint board shall prepare a reorganization plan not later
than December 1, 2026, for transferring the powers, duties, and
property of the township consistent with this chapter. The joint
board shall send the plan to the legislative body of the designated
unit for adoption.
(f) The legislative body of the designated unit may adopt the
plan as drafted or modify the plan before adoption.
Sec. 17. Elimination of a township office does not invalidate:
(1) any resolutions, fees, schedules, or other actions adopted
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


or taken by the township trustee or township assessor (if the
office exists) before January 1, 2028; or
(2) any appointments made by the township trustee or
township assessor (if the office exists) before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 18. (a) In 2027 and each year thereafter, the fiscal body of
the designated unit shall, in the manner provided by IC 6-1.1-17,
adopt a township services district levy for the ensuing year.
(b) If a designated unit fails to adopt a township services district
levy, the township service district's most recently approved
township services levy is continued for the ensuing budget year.
Sec. 19. (a) This section applies if:
(1) the designated unit is a municipality; and
(2) a part of the reorganized township is located outside the
boundaries of the municipality.
(b) The municipality shall establish:
(1) an urban township services district consisting of the area
of the township that is located within the boundaries of the
municipality; and
(2) a rural township services district consisting of the area of
the township located outside the boundaries of the
municipality.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), a tax levied under this section may
be levied at:
(1) a uniform rate upon all taxable property within the
township; or
(2) different rates for the township service districts included
within the township, so long as a tax rate applies uniformly to
all of a township service district's taxable property within the
township.
(d) If a uniform tax rate is levied upon all taxable property
within a township upon reorganization, different tax rates may be
levied for the township service districts included within the
township in subsequent years.
(e) Not later than October 1 of a year, the municipality shall
submit the township services district levy for the rural township
service district to the county fiscal body for its approval. Not later
than October 15 of the year, the county fiscal body shall review the
proposed township service district levy for the rural township
service district. The county fiscal body may reduce or modify but
not increase the proposed township service district levy.
(f) If:
(1) the municipality fails to adopt a township service district
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


levy; or
(2) a county fiscal body does not adopt the township service
district levy for a rural township district within the time
specified under subsection (c);
the township service district's most recent township service district
levy approved by the municipality or county, whichever is
appropriate, is continued for the ensuing budget year.
(g) A tax levied by the designated unit under this chapter after
December 31, 2028 shall:
(1) be in an amount sufficient for the designated unit to
provide township services within a township service district;
and
(2) include amounts necessary to continue payment of any
debt service or obligation incurred by the township before
January 1, 2028, in accordance with the terms of the debt
service or obligation incurred.
Sec. 20. For purposes of the property tax levy limits under
IC 6-1.1-18.5, a tax levied by a designated unit under this chapter
is included in the calculation of the maximum permissible property
tax levy for the designated unit. For property taxes first due and
payable in 2028, the designated unit's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 shall be increased
by:
(1) the township's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes first due and
payable in 2027; multiplied by
(2) the maximum levy growth quotient under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2
for property taxes first due and payable in 2028.
The designated unit's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes first due and
payable in 2028 as adjusted under this section shall be used in the
determination of the designated unit's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes
first due and payable in 2029 and thereafter.
Sec. 21. (a) The plan of reorganization governs the actions,
duties, and powers of the designated unit and the township that are
not specified by law.
(b) The plan of reorganization must be consistent with this
chapter and include at least the following:
(1) A description of the township services provided by the
designated unit and the service areas in which the services will
be offered.
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


(2) The disposition of the personnel, the agreements, the
assets, and, subject to section 30 of this chapter, the liabilities
of the township, including the terms and conditions upon
which the transfer of property and personnel will be achieved.
(3) Any other matter that the joint board determines to be
necessary or appropriate or to include in the plan of
reorganization.
(c) When the plan of reorganization is submitted to the
designated unit by the joint board, the designated unit shall post a
copy of the plan of reorganization on the website of the designated
unit not more than seven (7) days after receiving the plan of
reorganization from the joint board. If the plan of reorganization
is amended, the designated unit shall post the amended plan on the
website of the designated unit not later than seven (7) days after
the amended plan is adopted.
Sec. 22. The legislative body of the designated unit shall certify
the legislative body's final action on a plan of reorganization or
revised plan of reorganization, as modified by the legislative body,
in the manner prescribed by the department of local government
finance, to each of the following:
(1) The clerk of the circuit court and, if the designated unit is
a municipality, the clerk of the municipality.
(2) The county fiscal officer of each county in which the
township is located.
(3) The county recorder of each county in which the township
is located.
(4) The county voter registration office of each county in
which the township is located.
Sec. 23. The legislative body of the designated unit shall file a
certified copy of the plan with each of the following at the same
time certifications are made under section 22 of this chapter:
(1) The county recorder of each county in which a
reorganizing political subdivision is located.
(2) The department of local government finance.
(3) The clerk of the circuit court.
Sec. 24. Each county recorder receiving a certification under
sections 22 and 23 of this chapter shall record the certification and
the plan of reorganization in the records of the county recorder
without charge. The county recorder shall notify the county
election board of each county in which the township is located.
Sec. 25. (a) The township is reorganized under the conditions set
forth in the plan of reorganization filed with the county recorder
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


under this chapter.
(b) This subsection applies if the designated unit is a
municipality. If the municipal legislative body fails to adopt a
reorganization plan not later than December 31, 2026, the
township shall reorganize with the county in which the township is
primarily located. The county fiscal body shall:
(1) prepare a reorganization plan for adoption by the county
fiscal body that takes effect January 1, 2028; and
(2) take all other steps necessary under this article.
The county fiscal body has all of the powers and authority under
this chapter to prepare and implement a township reorganization
plan without the approval of the township.
Sec. 26. The department of local government finance is
expressly directed to complete the duties assigned to it under
IC 6-1.1-17-16 with respect to the submitted property tax levies,
property tax rates, and budget as follows:
(1) For each budget year, not later than December 31 of the
year preceding that budget year, unless a taxing unit in a
county is issuing debt after December 1 in the year preceding
the budget year or intends to file a shortfall appeal under
IC 6-1.1-18.5-16.
(2) For each budget year, not later than January 15 of the
budget year if a taxing unit in a county is issuing debt after
December 1 in the year preceding the budget year or intends
to file a shortfall appeal under IC 6-1.1-18.5-16.
Sec. 27. (a) This section applies to a reorganization under this
chapter that involves:
(1) a municipality as the designated unit; and
(2) at least one (1) township;
all of which are participating units in the same fire protection
territory on the date the reorganization plan is finally adopted
under this chapter.
(b) The fiscal body of the designated unit may:
(1) establish an equipment replacement fund under
IC 36-8-19-8.5 and impose a property tax for the fund as
provided in IC 36-8-19-8.5; and
(2) take any other action under IC 36-8-19-8.5 that may be
taken under that section by a participating unit in a fire
protection territory.
(c) If a designated unit establishes an equipment replacement
fund under IC 36-8-19-8.5 as authorized by this section, the
department of local government finance may adjust the maximum
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


permissible ad valorem property tax levy that would otherwise
apply to the designated unit in the same manner in which the
department may adjust the maximum permissible ad valorem
property tax levy of a civil taxing unit under IC 6-1.1-18.5-10.5 to
meet the civil taxing unit's obligations to a fire protection territory
established under IC 36-8-19.
Sec. 28. (a) A designated unit has the powers granted by statute
to a township, including a power described in subsection (b).
(b) Except as provided in the plan of reorganization, a
designated unit may do any of the following:
(1) Establish any fund that the township (either acting on its
own or jointly with another political subdivision) was
authorized to establish before January 1, 2028.
(2) Impose any tax levy or adopt any tax that the township
was authorized to impose or adopt before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 29. A plan of reorganization may establish within the
township, territories, or districts:
(1) in which specified services provided by the designated unit
will be provided at different levels, quantities, or amounts;
and
(2) in which the fees, charges, or taxes imposed by the
designated unit will vary depending on the level, quantity, or
amount of the services provided.
Sec. 30. The following apply:
(1) Indebtedness that was incurred by the designated unit or
township before January 1, 2028:
(A) may not be imposed on taxpayers that were not
responsible for payment of the indebtedness before
January 1, 2028; and
(B) must be paid by the taxpayers that were responsible for
payment of the indebtedness before January 1, 2028.
(2) Pension obligations existing as of January 1, 2028:
(A) may not be imposed on taxpayers that were not
responsible for payment of the pension obligations before
January 1, 2028; and
(B) must be paid by the taxpayers that were responsible for
payment of the pension obligations before January 1, 2028.
Sec. 31. The following apply to a reorganization under this
chapter:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2):
(A) the designated unit is responsible after December 31,
2027, for providing township services in all areas of the
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


township; and
(B) the designated unit retains the powers of a township
after December 31, 2027, in order to provide township
services as required by clause (A).
(2) Powers and duties of the designated unit may be
transferred as authorized in an interlocal cooperation
agreement approved under IC 36-1-7 or as authorized in a
cooperative agreement approved under IC 36-1.5-5.
(3) Section 30 of this chapter applies to the debt service levy
of the designated unit and to the department of local
government finance's determination of the new maximum
permissible ad valorem property tax levy for the designated
unit.
(4) The designated unit may not borrow money under
IC 36-6-6-14(b) or IC 36-6-6-14(c).
(5) The new maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
levy for the designated unit's firefighting and emergency
services fund under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the combined levies
for the firefighting fund and emergency services fund
described in IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2) is equal to:
(A) the result of:
(i) the maximum permissible ad valorem property tax
levy for the township's firefighting and emergency
services fund under IC 36-8-13-4(a)(1) or the combined
ad valorem property tax levies for the township
firefighting fund and township emergency services fund
described in IC 36-8-13-4(a)(2), as applicable, in 2027;
multiplied by
(ii) the maximum levy growth quotient applicable for
property taxes first due and payable in 2028; plus
(B) any amounts borrowed by the township under
IC 36-6-6-14(b) or IC 36-6-6-14(c) in 2027.
Sec. 32. (a) Except as provided in subsections (c) through (d), a
political subdivision may not take an action described in subsection
(b) within a township after December 31, 2026.
(b) A political subdivision may not take any of the following
actions partially or wholly within a township after December 31,
2026, unless the designated unit agrees by adopting a resolution:
(1) Initiate an annexation of territory.
(2) Establish a fire protection territory or fire protection
district.
(3) Extend water, sewer, or any other infrastructure to the
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


political subdivision.
(4) Expand zoning jurisdiction under IC 36-7-4-205.
(c) This chapter does not prohibit a designated unit from taking
an action under subsection (b) for the purpose of implementing the
plan of reorganization.
(d) A political subdivision may take an action described in
subsection (b) after December 31, 2027.
Sec. 33. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, until
the final plan of reorganization is approved by the legislative body
of the designated unit, the designated unit or township may not
promote a position on the reorganization by doing any of the
following:
(1) Using facilities or equipment, including mail and
messaging systems, owned by the designated unit or township
to promote a position on the reorganization, unless equal
access to the facilities or equipment is given to persons with a
position opposite to that of the designated unit or township.
(2) Making an expenditure of money from a fund controlled
by the designated unit or township to promote a position on
the reorganization.
(3) Using an employee to promote a position on the
reorganization during the employee's normal working hours
or paid overtime, or otherwise compelling an employee to
promote a position on the public question at any time.
However, if a person described in subsection (c) is advocating
for or against a position on the reorganization or discussing
the reorganization as authorized under subsection (c), an
employee of the designated unit or township may assist the
person in presenting information on the reorganization if
requested to do so by the person described in subsection (c).
However, this section does not prohibit an official or employee of
the designated unit or township from carrying out duties with
respect to a reorganization that are part of the normal and regular
conduct of the official's or employee's office or agency, including
the furnishing of factual information regarding the reorganization
in response to inquiries from any person.
(b) This subsection does not apply to:
(1) a personal expenditure to promote a position on a
reorganization by an employee of the designated unit or
township whose employment is governed by a collective
bargaining contract or an employment contract; or
(2) an expenditure to promote a position on a reorganization
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


by a person or an organization that has a contract or an
arrangement (whether formal or informal) with the
designated unit or township solely for the use of the political
subdivision's facilities.
A person or an organization that has a contract or arrangement
(whether formal or informal) with the designated unit or township
to provide goods or services to the designated unit or township may
not spend any money to promote a position on the reorganization.
A person or an organization that violates this subsection commits
a Class A infraction.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an elected or appointed
official of a designated unit or township may:
(1) personally advocate for or against a position on a
reorganization; or
(2) discuss the reorganization with any individual, group, or
organization or personally advocate for or against a position
on a reorganization before any individual, group, or
organization;
so long as it is not done by using public funds. Advocacy or
discussion allowed under this subsection is not considered a use of
public funds.
Sec. 34. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed:
(1) to constitute an annexation of a township by a municipality
under the provisions of this chapter; or
(2) as changing the corporate boundaries of a municipality
that is the designated unit of the dissolved township.
SECTION 3. An emergency is declared for this act.
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Local Government, to which was
referred House Bill 1315, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, delete lines 8 through 9, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to a township:
(1) located in a county having a consolidated city; or
(2) that, on June 1, 2026, has begun to consolidate with
another:
(A) township under IC 36-6-1.5; or
(B) unit under IC 36-1.5-4; or
(3) located in a county in which each township located in the
county consolidates in accordance with subdivision (2) to
establish not more than one (1) township whose boundaries
coincide with the boundaries of the county and the
consolidated township would not meet the population
requirement described in section 6(1)(A) of this chapter.".
Page 2, line 32, delete "was at least two hundred percent (200%)"
and insert "does not exceed two hundred percent (200%)".
Page 2, delete lines 37 through 38, begin a new line double block
indented and insert:
"(A) At least eighty percent (80%) of the total area of the
township is located within the corporate boundaries of a
municipality.".
Page 11, between lines 35 and 36, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 30. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed:
(1) to constitute as an annexation of an applicable township by
a municipality under the provisions of this chapter; or
(2) as changing the corporate boundaries of a municipality
that is the designated unit of the dissolved township.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1315 as introduced.)
MAY
Committee Vote: yeas 9, nays 3.
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Ways and Means, to which was
referred House Bill 1315, has had the same under consideration and
begs leave to report the same back to the House with the
recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 2, line 38, after "department." insert "For purposes of this
clause, a township that is:
(i) a provider unit or nonprovider unit in a fire
protection territory; or
(ii) part of a fire protection district;
does not operate a fire department.".
Page 3, line 11, after "department." insert "For purposes of this
clause, a township that is:
(i) a provider unit or nonprovider unit in a fire
protection territory; or
(ii) part of a fire protection district;
does not operate a fire department.".
Page 4, between lines 9 and 10, begin a new line block indented and
insert:
"(4) If a township participates in a fire protection territory or
fire protection district, the fire protection territory or fire
protection district is unaffected by the reorganization and the
area within the boundaries of the dissolved township remain
a part of the fire protection territory or fire protection district
after reorganization. The designated unit succeeds the
township in the township's role as:
(A) provider unit or nonprovider unit in the fire protection
territory; or
(B) participant in the fire protection district;
for the area within the boundaries of the dissolved township.".
Page 4, line 10, delete "(4)" and insert "(5)".
Page 4, line 12, delete "(5)" and insert "(6)".
Page 4, line 15, delete "(6)" and insert "(7)".
Page 4, line 18, delete "(7)" and insert "(8)".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1315 as printed January 13, 2026.)
THOMPSON
Committee Vote: yeas 15, nays 9.
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1315 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 2, line 10, delete "that, on June 1, 2026," and insert "that, not
later than December 31, 2026,".
Page 2, line 24, delete "11" and insert "13".
Page 2, line 25, delete "to which section 12 or 21 of this chapter
applies." and insert "that becomes the designated unit under section
of this chapter.".
Page 2, line 40, delete "provider unit or nonprovider unit" and insert
"participating unit that is not a provider unit".
Page 3, line 18, delete "provider unit or nonprovider unit" and insert
"participating unit that is not a provider unit".
Page 3, after line 42, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "township services district"
means a service district that is located within the boundaries of the
reorganized township in which the designated unit imposes a
township services district levy.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "township services district levy"
means the budget, tax rate, and tax levy imposed by the designated
unit within the boundaries of a township services district.".
Page 4, line 1, delete "9." and insert "11.".
Page 4, line 27, delete "provider unit or nonprovider unit" and insert
"participating unit that is not a provider unit".
Page 4, line 39, delete "26" and insert "30".
Page 5, line 2, delete "10." and insert "12.".
Page 5, line 6, delete "11" and insert "13".
Page 5, line 11, delete "11" and insert "13".
Page 5, line 13, delete "11." and insert "13.".
Page 5, line 19, delete "10" and insert "12".
Page 5, line 26, delete "10" and insert "12".
Page 5, line 28, delete "14" and insert "16".
Page 5, line 29, delete "12." and insert "14.".
Page 5, line 29, delete "11" and insert "13".
Page 5, line 33, delete "14" and insert "16".
Page 5, line 36, delete "13." and insert "15.".
Page 5, line 37, delete "11" and insert "13".
Page 5, line 39, delete "14" and insert "16".
Page 6, delete lines 3 through 16, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"Sec. 16. (a) A joint board shall consist of the following:
(1) Two (2) members of the township board of each township
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


participating in the reorganization, selected by the members
of the township board.
(2) Four (4) members of the legislative body of the designated
municipality or of the fiscal body of the designated county,
whichever is applicable, selected by the members of the body.
(3) The township trustee of each township participating in the
reorganization.
(4) The deputy township trustee or a full-time township
employee of each township participating in the
reorganization.
The fiscal officer of the designated municipality or county, and
other members of the bodies under subdivisions (1) and (2), shall
serve as advisory, nonvoting members.
(b) A majority of the voting members constitutes a quorum.
Official action may only be taken by affirmative vote of at least a
majority of members present at the meeting.".
Page 6, line 29, delete "15." and insert "17.".
Page 6, delete lines 35 through 38, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"Sec. 18. (a) In 2027 and each year thereafter, the fiscal body of
the designated unit shall, in the manner provided by IC 6-1.1-17,
adopt a township services district levy for the ensuing year.
(b) If a designated unit fails to adopt a township services district
levy, the township service district's most recently approved
township services levy is continued for the ensuing budget year.
Sec. 19. (a) This section applies if:
(1) the designated unit is a municipality; and
(2) a part of the reorganized township is located outside the
boundaries of the municipality.
(b) The municipality shall establish:
(1) an urban township services district consisting of the area
of the township that is located within the boundaries of the
municipality; and
(2) a rural township services district consisting of the area of
the township located outside the boundaries of the
municipality.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), a tax levied under this section may
be levied at:
(1) a uniform rate upon all taxable property within the
township; or
(2) different rates for the township service districts included
within the township, so long as a tax rate applies uniformly to
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


all of a township service district's taxable property within the
township.
(d) If a uniform tax rate is levied upon all taxable property
within a township upon reorganization, different tax rates may be
levied for the township service districts included within the
township in subsequent years.
(e) Not later than October 1 of a year, the municipality shall
submit the township services district levy for the rural township
service district to the county fiscal body for its approval. Not later
than October 15 of the year, the county fiscal body shall review the
proposed township service district levy for the rural township
service district. The county fiscal body may reduce or modify but
not increase the proposed township service district levy.
(f) If:
(1) the municipality fails to adopt a township service district
levy; or
(2) a county fiscal body does not adopt the township service
district levy for a rural township district within the time
specified under subsection (c);
the township service district's most recent township service district
levy approved by the municipality or county, whichever is
appropriate, is continued for the ensuing budget year.
(g) A tax levied by the designated unit under this chapter after
December 31, 2028 shall:
(1) be in an amount sufficient for the designated unit to
provide township services within a township service district;
and
(2) include amounts necessary to continue payment of any
debt service or obligation incurred by the township before
January 1, 2028, in accordance with the terms of the debt
service or obligation incurred.
Sec. 20. For purposes of the property tax levy limits under
IC 6-1.1-18.5, a tax levied by a designated unit under this chapter
is included in the calculation of the maximum permissible property
tax levy for the designated unit. For property taxes first due and
payable in 2028, the designated unit's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 shall be increased
by:
(1) the township's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes first due and
payable in 2027; multiplied by
(2) the maximum levy growth quotient under IC 6-1.1-18.5-2
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87


for property taxes first due and payable in 2028.
The designated unit's maximum permissible ad valorem property
tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes first due and
payable in 2028 as adjusted under this section shall be used in the
determination of the designated unit's maximum permissible ad
valorem property tax levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5 for property taxes
first due and payable in 2029 and thereafter.".
Page 6, line 39, delete "17." and insert "21.".
Page 7, line 6, delete "26" and insert "30".
Page 7, line 20, delete "18." and insert "22.".
Page 7, line 33, delete "19." and insert "23.".
Page 7, line 35, delete "18" and insert "22".
Page 7, line 40, delete "20." and insert "24.".
Page 7, line 41, delete "18 and 19" and insert "22 and 23".
Page 8, line 3, delete "21." and insert "25.".
Page 8, line 17, delete "22." and insert "26.".
Page 8, line 30, delete "23." and insert "27.".
Page 9, line 11, delete "24." and insert "28.".
Page 9, line 20, delete "25." and insert "29.".
Page 9, line 28, delete "26." and insert "30.".
Page 9, line 42, delete "27." and insert "31.".
Page 10, line 13, delete "26" and insert "30".
Page 10, line 37, delete "28." and insert "32.".
Page 11, line 12, delete "29." and insert "33.".
Page 12, line 26, delete "30." and insert "34.".
Page 12, line 27, delete "as an annexation of an applicable" and
insert "an annexation of a".
(Reference is to HB 1315 as printed January 27, 2026.)
SHONKWILER
HB 1315—LS 6995/DI 87